Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 1. Organization.

Administrative Code. —

For office management, see 21 AAC 10.

Sec. 24.55.010.
Office of the ombudsman.

There is created in the legislative branch of the state the office of the ombudsman.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.020.
Appointment of the ombudsman.

A candidate for appointment as the ombudsman shall be nominated by the ombudsman selection committee composed of three members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate and three members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house. One member of the minority party caucus in each house shall be appointed to the selection committee.

The ombudsman selection committee shall examine persons to serve as ombudsman regarding their qualifications and ability and shall place the name of the person selected in nomination. The appointment is effective if the nomination is approved by a roll call vote of two-thirds of the members of the legislature in joint session and approved by the governor. However, the governor may veto the appointment and return it, with a statement of objections, to the legislature. Upon receipt of a veto message the legislature shall meet immediately in joint session and reconsider approval of the vetoed appointment. The vetoed appointment becomes effective by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the membership of the legislature in joint session. The vote on the appointment and on reconsideration of a vetoed appointment shall be entered in the journals of both houses.

The appointment of the ombudsman becomes effective if, while the legislature is in session, the governor neither approves nor vetoes it within 15 days, Sundays excepted, after its delivery to the governor. If the legislature is not in session and the governor neither approves nor vetoes the appointment within 20 days, Sundays excepted, after its delivery to the governor, the appointment becomes effective.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.030.
Qualifications; prohibition against political activity.

A person may not serve as ombudsman

within one year of the last day on which the person served as a member of the legislature;

while the person is a candidate for or holds any other national, state, or municipal office; nor may the ombudsman become a candidate for national, state, or municipal office until one year has elapsed from the date the ombudsman vacates the office of ombudsman;

while the person is engaged in any other occupation for which the person receives compensation;

unless the person is at least 21 years of age and is a qualified voter who has been a resident of the state for at least three years.

It is essential that the nonpartisan nature, integrity, and impartiality of the ombudsman’s functions and services be maintained. The ombudsman and members of the staff of the ombudsman may not join, support, or otherwise participate in a partisan political organization, faction, or activity, including but not limited to the making of political contributions. However, this subsection does not restrict the ombudsman or members of the staff of the ombudsman from expressing private opinion, registering as to party, or voting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.040.
Term of office.

The term of office of the ombudsman is five years. An ombudsman may be reappointed but may not serve for more than three terms.

If the term of an ombudsman expires without the appointment of a successor under this chapter, the incumbent ombudsman may continue in office until a successor is appointed. If the ombudsman dies, resigns, becomes ineligible to serve, or is removed or suspended from office, the person appointed as acting ombudsman under AS

24.55.070(a)

serves until a new ombudsman is appointed for a full term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Sec. 24.55.050.
Removal.

The legislature, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a roll call vote of two-thirds of the members in each house entered in the journal, may remove or suspend the ombudsman from office, but only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or disability.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.060.
Compensation.

The ombudsman is entitled to receive an annual salary equal to a step in Range 26 on the salary schedule set out in AS

39.27.011(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, substituted “equal to a step in Range 26” for “equal to step A , Range 26” and deleted “for Juneau” at the end.

Sec. 24.55.070.
Staff and delegation.

The ombudsman shall appoint a person to serve as acting ombudsman in the absence of the ombudsman. The ombudsman shall also appoint assistants and clerical personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The ombudsman may delegate to the assistants any of the ombudsman’s duties except those specified in AS

24.55.190

and

24.55.200

; however, during the ombudsman’s absence from the principal business offices, the ombudsman may delegate the duties specified in AS

24.55.190

and

24.55.200

to the acting ombudsman for the duration of the absence. The duties specified in AS 24.55.190 and 24.55.200 shall be performed by the acting ombudsman when serving under AS

24.55.040(b)

.

The ombudsman and the staff appointed by the ombudsman are in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

and are not subject to the employment policies under AS 24.10 or AS 24.20.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, staff appointed by the ombudsman may be employed under a personal services contract as provided by AS

24.10.060(f)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 21 SLA 1987; am §§ 2, 3 ch 71 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, added (d).

Sec. 24.55.080.
Office facilities and administration.

Subject to restrictions and limitations imposed by the executive director of the Legislative Affairs Agency, the administrative facilities and services of the Legislative Affairs Agency, including computer, data processing, and teleconference facilities, may be made available to the ombudsman to be used in the management of the office of the ombudsman and to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The salary and benefits of the ombudsman and the permanent staff of the ombudsman shall be paid through the same procedures used for payment of the salaries and benefits of other permanent legislative employees.

The ombudsman shall submit a budget for each fiscal year to the Alaska Legislative Council and the council shall annually submit an estimated budget to the governor for information purposes in the preparation of the executive budget. After reviewing and approving, with or without modifications, the budget submitted by the ombudsman, the council shall submit the approved budget to the finance committees of the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am §§ 4, 5 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For records, see 21 AAC 10, art. 3.

Sec. 24.55.090.
Procedure.

The ombudsman shall, by regulations adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), establish procedures for receiving and processing complaints, conducting investigations, reporting findings, and ensuring that confidential information obtained by the ombudsman in the course of an investigation will not be improperly disclosed.

The ombudsman may not charge fees for the submission or investigation of complaints.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For business offices and hours, see 21 AAC 10, art. 1.

For records, see 21 AAC 10, art. 3.

For grievances, see 21 AAC 10, art. 4.

For receiving and processing complaints, see 21 AAC 20, art. 1.

For conducting an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 2.

For concluding an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 3.

For confidential information, see 21 AAC 20, art. 4.